Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-405
Privilege of leaving jail; meals; transportation.

If necessarily absent from jail at mealtime, the prisoner shall, at his request, be furnished with an adequate meal to carry with him during his absence and the chief of police, county sheriff, or other governmental agency may provide for the transportation of prisoners released pursuant to sections 47-401 to 47-411. Such meals and transportation shall be considered as a cost incident to the confinement of the prisoner.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 5, p. 814.